Utah statutes.
17-16-12.   Business to be finished before expiration of term.

It shall be the duty of all officers in this title named to complete the business of their respective offices to the time of the expiration of their respective terms, and in case an officer at the close of his term shall leave to his successor official labor to be performed for which he has received compensation or which it was his duty to perform, he shall be liable to pay his successor the full value of such service.

